Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB777.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 158.442 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The General Assembly hereby authorizes the establishment of the Center for School
Safety. The center's mission shall be to serve as the central point for data analysis;
research; dissemination of information about successful school safety and school
security programs, best practices, training standards, research results, and new
programs; and, in collaboration with the Department of Education and others, to
provide technical assistance for safe schools.
(2) To fulfill its mission, the Center for School Safety shall:
(a) Establish a clearinghouse for information and materials concerning school
violence prevention;
(b) Provide program development and implementation expertise and technical
support to schools, law enforcement agencies, and communities, which may
include coordinating training for administrators, teachers, students, parents,
and other community representatives;
(c) Analyze the data collected in compliance with KRS 158.444;
(d) Research and evaluate school safety programs so schools and communities are
better able to address their specific needs;
(e) Administer a school safety grant program for local districts as directed by the
General Assembly;
(f) Promote the formation of interagency efforts to address discipline and safety
issues within communities throughout the state in collaboration with other
postsecondary education institutions and with local juvenile delinquency
prevention councils;
(g) Prepare and disseminate information regarding best practices in creating safe
and effective schools;
Page 1 of 10
XXXX 2/19/2025 8:37 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1950
(h) Advise the Kentucky Board of Education on administrative policies and
administrative regulations relating to school safety and security;
(i) By July 1 of each year, provide an annual report to the Governor, the
Kentucky Board of Education, and the Interim Joint Committee on Education
regarding the status of school safety in Kentucky, including the number and
placement of school resource officers working in school districts in Kentucky
and the source of funding and method of employment for each position in
accordance with KRS 158.4414;
(j) Develop and implement a school safety coordinator training program based on
national and state best practices in collaboration with the Kentucky
Department of Education for school safety coordinators appointed pursuant to
KRS 158.4412. The training shall be approved by the board of directors of the
Center for School Safety and include instruction on at least the following:
1. Policies and procedures for conducting emergency response drills using
an all-hazards approach including hostage and active shooter situations;
2. Identification and response to threats to school safety and security; and
3. Preparing for, conducting, and reviewing school security risk
assessments in accordance with KRS 158.4410;
(k) Develop and implement a system to provide certification to school districts
that the center has verified that:
1. A potential Kentucky guardian, as defined in KRS 158.4431, has met all
of the requirements of KRS 158.4431(3) and
2. Individuals employed as guardians meet the requirements of KRS
158.4431(4) and (5), as necessary;
(l) If funds are available, employ an individual whose job responsibilities include
oversight of the guardian program, including but not limited to:
1. The requirements of paragraph (k) of this subsection; and
Page 2 of 10
XXXX 2/19/2025 8:37 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1950
2. The creation of model policy to be used by local boards of education
when adopting the policies in KRS 158.4431(8); and
(m) [Administer and oversee the School Mapping Data Program established
pursuant to KRS 158.4433; and
(n) ]Award a school safety coordinator certificate of completion to a school safety
coordinator upon satisfactory completion of the training program.
(3) The Center for School Safety shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of
fifteen (15) members. Members shall consist of:
(a) The commissioner or a designee of the Department of Education;
(b) The secretary or a designee of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(c) The commissioner or a designee of the Department for Behavioral Health,
Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities;
(d) The commissioner or a designee of the Department of Kentucky State Police;
(e) The commissioner or a designee of the Department of Criminal Justice
Training;
(f) The executive director or a designee of the Kentucky Office of Homeland
Security;
(g) A representative which shall be appointed by the Governor from one (1) list
of three (3) names submitted by the Kentucky League of Cities;
(h) A representative which shall be appointed by the Governor from one (1) list
of three (3) names submitted by the Kentucky School Boards Association;
(i) A representative which shall be appointed by the Governor from one (1) list
of three (3) names submitted by the Kentucky Association of School
Superintendents;
(j) A representative which shall be appointed by the Governor from one (1) list
of three (3) names submitted by the Kentucky Association of School Resource
Officers;
Page 3 of 10
XXXX 2/19/2025 8:37 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1950
(k) A representative which shall be appointed by the Governor from one (1) list
of three (3) names submitted by the Kentucky Education Association;
(l) A representative which shall be appointed by the Governor from one (1) list
of three (3) names submitted by the Kentucky School Nurses Association;
(m) A representative which shall be appointed by the Governor from one (1) list
of three (3) names submitted by the Kentucky Association for Psychology in
the Schools;
(n) A representative which shall be appointed by the Governor from one (1) list
of three (3) names submitted by the Kentucky School Counselor Association;
and
(o) A representative which shall be appointed by the Governor from one (1) list
of three (3) names submitted by the Kentucky Parent Teacher Association.
(4) Notwithstanding KRS 12.028, the Center for School Safety and its board of
directors shall not be subject to reorganization by the Governor.
Section 2. KRS 39G.010 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Office of Homeland Security shall be attached to the Office of the
Governor and shall be headed by an executive director appointed by the Governor.
(2) The executive director shall:
(a) Publicize the findings of the General Assembly stressing the dependence on
Almighty God as being vital to the security of the Commonwealth by
including the provisions of KRS 39A.285(3) in its agency training and
educational materials. The executive director shall also be responsible for
prominently displaying a permanent plaque at the entrance to the state's
Emergency Operations Center stating the text of KRS 39A.285(3);
(b) Establish and chair an interagency working group composed of the chair of
the Senate Veterans, Military Affairs, and Public Protection Committee, the
chair of the House of Representatives Seniors, Military Affairs, and Public
Page 4 of 10
XXXX 2/19/2025 8:37 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1950
Safety Committee, state agency representation, and private agency
representation. The working group shall have the purpose of identifying risks
and needs and making a complete assessment of the preparedness of the
Commonwealth to respond to acts of war or terrorism, including nuclear,
biological, chemical, electromagnetic pulse, agro-, eco-, or cyber-terrorism;
(c) Serve as the State Appointed Administrator for the United States Department
of Homeland Security;
(d) Implement all homeland security presidential and gubernatorial directives,
including directives pertaining to state and local compliance with the National
Incident Management System;
(e) Coordinate the efforts of the Kentucky Office of Homeland Security with the
efforts of the federal Department of Homeland Security;
(f) Accept and allocate any homeland security funds in compliance with
applicable federal and state laws and administrative regulations; and
(g) Inform the members of the General Assembly of the process by which a
public agency applies for a federal homeland security grant and shall provide
the following information to the members at least ninety (90) days before an
application deadline:
1. The application deadline;
2. How a public agency can obtain an application form;
3. How a public agency can obtain assistance in filling out an application
form; and
4. Any other information that would be helpful to a public agency
interested in applying for a federal homeland security grant.
(3) The executive director may delegate responsibilities created under this section to
another executive branch agency.
(4) The Kentucky Office of Homeland Security shall:
Page 5 of 10
XXXX 2/19/2025 8:37 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1950
(a) Develop and publish a comprehensive statewide homeland security strategy
that coordinates state and local efforts to detect, deter, mitigate, and respond
to a terrorist incident;
(b) Develop a comprehensive strategy addressing how state and federal funds and
other assistance will be allocated within the state to purchase specialized
equipment required to prevent and respond effectively and safely to terrorist
incidents;
(c) Urge the state and local governments to exceed minimum federal
requirements for receiving assistance in preparing to respond to acts of war or
terrorism in the hope that the Commonwealth will become a national leader in
this preparation;
(d) Provide information explaining how individuals and private organizations,
including volunteer and religious organizations, can best prepare for and
respond to incidents contemplated by this section and to other threatened,
impending, or declared emergencies and whom to contact should they desire
to volunteer help or services during such an emergency. The program shall
identify and encourage these private organizations to specifically commit to
provide food, shelter, personnel, equipment, materials, consultation, and
advice, or other services needed to respond to these incidents;
(e) Administer the Kentucky Intelligence Fusion Center and coordinate its
operations with other federal, state, and local agencies;
(f) 1. Form the Commonwealth Activity Taxonomy System (CATS)
Committee to develop and oversee a system of evaluating special events
to determine, plan, mitigate, and respond to risks and threats to the
Commonwealth.
2. The committee shall consist of members from no fewer than five (5)
state agencies, including:
Page 6 of 10
XXXX 2/19/2025 8:37 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1950
a. Kentucky Office of Homeland Security;
b. Kentucky Division of Emergency Management;
c. Kentucky National Guard; and
d. Kentucky State Police.
3. The committee shall establish a quantitative system to identify and rank
state public events, maintain public safety, and protect public property.
4. Membership shall be determined by the state agencies identified in
subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, and the executive director of the
Kentucky Office of Homeland Security shall appoint other members as
necessary.
5. The committee shall elect a chair and a vice chair from its members who
shall serve in those capacities for a term of two (2) years. A majority of
the committee shall constitute a quorum for the purposes of conducting
business.
6. The committee shall meet when called by the chair, or at the request of
the executive director of the Kentucky Office of Homeland Security;[
and]
(g) Administer and oversee the School Mapping Data Program established
pursuant to Section 3 of this Act; and
(h) Promulgate any administrative regulations necessary to carry out the
provisions of this chapter.
(5) The adjutant general, or his or her designee, shall concurrently notify the Governor
and the executive director of the Office of Homeland Security of a disaster or
emergency involving homeland security. The adjutant general, or his or her
designee, shall be the Governor's primary point of contact for managing and
responding to a disaster or emergency involving homeland security.
Section 3. KRS 158.4433 is amended to read as follows:
Page 7 of 10
XXXX 2/19/2025 8:37 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1950
(1) As used in this section, "school mapping data" means mapping information
provided in an electronic or a digital format to assist first responders in responding
to emergencies at schools.
(2) (a) The General Assembly does hereby establish the School Mapping Data
Program to be administered by the Office of Homeland Security[Center for
School Safety]. The Office of Homeland Security[Center for School Safety]
shall utilize available funds to develop school mapping data for each public
school, public charter school, and any private school that requests to
participate in the program. The program shall be administered by the Office of
Homeland Security[Center for School Safety] pursuant to this section, which
may include contracting for services pursuant to the relevant provisions of the
Kentucky Model Procurement Code in KRS Chapter 45A. The Office of
Homeland Security[Center for School Safety] shall be responsible for
ensuring that all funds received for and expended related to the School
Mapping Data Program are utilized for the purposes of school mapping.
(b) The Office of Homeland Security[Center for School Safety] shall provide the
data developed by the program to the state school security marshal,
participating schools, participating districts, and local law enforcement and
public safety agencies for use in response to emergencies and for conducting
drills required under KRS 158.162(5). The school mapping data shall be
excluded from the application of KRS 61.870 to 61.884.
(c) The Office of Homeland Security[Center for School Safety] shall apply for
any federal grant funds that may be used to accomplish the purposes of the
program. The Office of Homeland Security[Center for School Safety] may
also solicit private funds to support the program.
(3) The School Mapping Data Program shall establish a single verified source of
mapping data for each participating school campus in the state that is standardized,
Page 8 of 10
XXXX 2/19/2025 8:37 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1950
accurate, and accessible to public safety agencies to ensure efficient response to any
emergency on a school campus. The school mapping data provided shall:
(a) Be compatible with software platforms used by local, county, state, and
federal public safety agencies that provide emergency services to the specific
school for which the data is provided without requiring such agencies to
purchase additional software or requiring a fee to view or access the data;
(b) Be compatible with security software platforms in use by the participating
school or district for which the data is provided without requiring the school
or district to purchase additional software or requiring a fee to view or access
the data;
(c) Be in a printable format and, if requested by a law enforcement or public
safety agency or participating school or district in addition to those described
in paragraph (a) of this subsection, be in a digital file format that can be
integrated into interactive mobile platforms in use;
(d) Be verified by the Office of Homeland Security[Center for School Safety] for
accuracy by a walk-through of school buildings and grounds;
(e) Be oriented to true north;
(f) Include accurate floor plans overlaid on current, verified aerial imagery of
campus;
(g) Contain site-specific labeling that matches the structure of school buildings
that includes:
1. Room labels;
2. Hallway names or identifiers;
3. External door or stairwell numbers;
4. Locations of hazards;
5. Critical utility locations;
6. Key boxes;
Page 9 of 10
XXXX 2/19/2025 8:37 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1950
7. Automated external defibrillators; and
8. Trauma kits;
(h) Contain site-specific labeling that matches the school grounds that includes:
1. Parking areas;
2. Athletic fields;
3. Surrounding roads; and
4. Neighboring properties;
(i) Be overlaid with a gridded coordinate system;
(j) Not be modified or updated independently without corresponding updates to
school mapping data within software platforms used by local, county, state,
and federal public safety agencies that provide emergency services to the
specific school; and
(k) Provide to public safety agencies and participating schools or districts the
school mapping data developed pursuant to the program perpetually and at no
cost to the public safety agencies or participating schools or districts.
(4) A participating school district or campus shall not be required to adopt new school
mapping data if, as of July 1, 2024, the school district or campus previously
implemented school mapping data with capabilities that meet the requirements of
subsection (3)(a) to (k) of this section.
Page 10 of 10
XXXX 2/19/2025 8:37 AM Jacketed